Massachusetts, session 194th, H791.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the executive
office of health and human services shall, not later than 90 days after the effective date of this
act, pursue and submit applications for new state plan amendments, state plan options or state
plan waiver or demonstration requests for federal approval that will establish an assisted living
service to allow individuals qualifying for Medicaid and at risk of entering a nursing home to
reside in a certified assisted living residence; provided, however, that the average daily rate
developed for such service, when combined with the average daily benefit assistance provided by
the Supplemental Security Income program inclusive of the state supplementary payment
program authorized under section 131 of chapter 6 of the General Laws and chapter 118A of the
General Laws, shall not exceed 80 per cent of the cost of substantially similar institutional care
for the equivalent waiver year as demonstrated by the Factor G value of Appendix J of the
current MassHealth frail elder home and community-based services waiver, 0059.R08.00;
provided further, that MassHealth shall implement a rate schedule for such assisted living service
of 3

that uses disproportionate share payment methodologies to ensure equal economic access to the
assisted living care setting for long-term care services and supports when measured with
consideration for the level of access that MassHealth members have for institutional services.
SECTION 2. The executive office of health and human services shall, not later than 120
days after the effective date of this act, report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means on the status of submitted and pending applications described in section 1 and the
projected fiscal impact to the commonwealth of federal approval for such applications. The
report shall include, but not be limited to, comment on the deliberations and decisions regarding:
(i) amending the current MassHealth frail elder waiver to include assisted living services as a
new waiver service in a manner comparable to how the District of Columbia Medicaid program
has delivered services to members residing in assisted living settings; (ii) implementing a new
home and community-based services waiver under section 1915(c) of the Social Security Act for
the sole purpose of establishing assisted living services as an option for MassHealth members in
a manner comparable to how the Ohio Medicaid program has delivered services to members
residing in assisted living settings; and (iii) enabling assisted living as a setting of choice for
MassHealth members participating in managed care programs with reference to “in lieu of
services and setting” authority as enabled by 42 C.F.R. 435.3(e)(2) in a manner comparable to
how the California Medicaid program has delivered services to members residing in assisted
living settings.
SECTION 3. The executive office of aging and independence shall, not later than 180
days after the effective date of this act, report to the joint committee on elder affairs on the
current structural, organizational or cultural barriers that are experienced by MassHealth
members and such members’ potential to reside at an assisted living residence that is located
of 3

within their community. The report shall include, but not be limited to, particular consideration
of residents within qualified census tracts or difficult development areas and such residents’
ability and likelihood to access assisted living residences in comparison to their ability and
likelihood to access nursing facility services.
of 3